Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Chapter 38

Private Fire Companies

7-38-101. Formation.

Any number of persons, resident within a municipality, may form themselves into a company for the purpose of extinguishing fires, by having their names and objective recorded in the register's office of the county.

Code 1858, § 1706 (deriv. Acts 1831, ch. 27, § 1); Shan., § 3019; mod. Code 1932, § 5244; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2401.

Cross-References. Commission on fire fighting personnel standards and education, title 4, ch. 24, part 1.

Rural fire protection equipment, title 4, ch. 31, part 5.

Attorney General Opinions. Requirement of local governments to provide police, fire, and medical services. OAG 10-03, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 3 (1/19/10).

7-38-102. Rules and regulations — Fines.

A company may make rules and regulations for their government, and may impose fines for nonattendance or other delinquencies, not exceeding twenty dollars ($20.00), upon their members, to be recovered in the name adopted for such company before any judge of the court of general sessions.

Code 1858, § 1707 (deriv. Acts 1831, ch. 27, § 1); Shan., § 3020; Code 1932, § 5245; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, §§ 2, 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2402.

7-38-103. Property.

The company may also procure fire engines, buckets, hooks, ladders, and all implements necessary for working such engines and carrying out the objectives of its formation, and may hold property, real or personal, sufficient for its purposes, and as a place for the keeping of the implements and meetings of its members.

Code 1858, § 1708 (deriv. Acts 1831, ch. 27, § 1); Shan., § 3021; Code 1932, § 5246; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2403.

7-38-104. Exemption from military service.

The members of these companies, and the fire companies of any incorporated town or city are exempt from military duty in time of peace.

Code 1858, § 1709 (deriv. Acts 1831, ch. 27, § 2); Acts 1877, ch. 52, § 1; Shan., § 3022; Code 1932, § 5247; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2404; Acts 2008, ch. 1159, § 2.